Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.210

Transfer of assets to new fund—Assumption of obligations.

(1) Funds or assets on hand in the firefighters' relief and pension fund of any municipality established under the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, after payment of warrants drawn upon and payable therefrom, shall, by the city treasurer, be transferred to and placed in the firefighters' pension fund created by this chapter; and the firefighters' pension fund created by this chapter shall be liable for and there shall be paid therefrom in the order of their issuance any and all unpaid warrants drawn upon said firefighters' relief and pension fund.

(2) Any moneys loaned or advanced by a municipality from the general or any other fund of such municipality to the firefighters' relief and pension fund created under the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, and not repaid shall be an obligation of the firefighters' pension fund created under this chapter, and shall at such times and in such amounts as is directed by the board be repaid.

[ 2007 c 218 s 37; 1947 c 91 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-49.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.